Hawaii, session 2026, SB2501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 83, Session Laws of Hawaii 2012, extended the prohibition of counties from requiring the installation or retrofitting of automatic fire sprinklers or automatic fire sprinkler systems in new or existing detached residential one- and two-family dwelling units and non-residential agricultural and aquacultural buildings and structures located outside of urban areas, except to meet firefighting road access or water supply requirements for residential one- and two-family dwelling units.  Because of their reliability and effectiveness in suppressing fires in their initial stages, national residential building codes have required residential fire sprinklers since 2009. The legislature further finds that prohibiting any measure that may be considered and adopted at the local level to improve and enhance the fire survivability and reduce fire losses of community residents is not in the best interest of public safety.  Further, residential fire sprinklers greatly reduce fire spread, thereby significantly reducing property damage and loss. The legislature also finds that the intensity, severity, and spread of fires in residential buildings are directly related to the building's contents and furnishings.  Although improvements have been made in building construction, design, and materials, the volatility and toxicity of today's synthetic materials allow untenable conditions to be reached more rapidly. The legislature recognizes that the counties face unique challenges and issues related to fire protection, including population density, proximity of structures, infrastructure, access, and limited fire-protection resources. Therefore, the intention of this Act is to recognize and establish the authority of individual counties. According to a report by the National Fire Protection Associations fire sprinkler initiative, twenty states currently allow counties to adopt codes requiring the installation and retrofitting of fire sprinklers in residential family units. The legislature additionally finds that the state building code council is responsible for adopting, amending, and updating building codes and standards in the State.  In 2024, the state building code council adopted the state residential code, which requires all state construction of new one- and two-family dwellings to include residential fire sprinklers. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to amend Act 83 to repeal section 46-19.8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, on June 30, 2026. SECTION 2.  Act 83, Session Laws of Hawaii 2012, as amended by Act 53, Session Laws of Hawaii 2017, is amended by amending section 3 to read as follows: "SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2012; provided that on June 30, [2027,] 2026, this Act shall be repealed." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request